Utah statutes.
26-8b-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Automatic external defibrillator" or "AED" means an automated or
automatic computerized medical device that:
(a)  has received pre-market notification approval from the United States Food
and Drug Administration, pursuant to Section 360(k), Title 21 of the United
States Code;
(b)  is capable of recognizing the presence or absence of ventricular
fibrillation or rapid ventricular tachycardia;
(c)  is capable of determining, without intervention by an operator, whether
defibrillation should be performed; and
(d)  upon determining that defibrillation should be performed, automatically
charges, enabling delivery of an electrical impulse through the chest wall and
to a person's heart.
(2)  "Bureau" means the Bureau of Emergency Medical Services, within the
department.
(3)  "Cardiopulmonary resuscitation" or "CPR" means artificial ventilation or
external chest compression applied to a person who is in respiratory or
cardiac arrest.
(4)  "Emergency medical dispatch center" means a public safety answering
point, as defined in Section 63C-7-103, that is designated as an emergency
medical dispatch center by the bureau.
(5)  "Sudden cardiac arrest" means a life-threatening condition that results
when a person's heart stops or fails to produce a pulse.
